Hawaii statutes.
[§846-54] Annual reports. The attorney
general shall summarize and analyze reports of hate crimes data that are
received, and shall compile and transmit an annual report of hate crime data to
the governor, the judiciary, the department of public safety, and the
legislature. [L 2001, c 240, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next